Vermont, session 2025-2026, H306.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 27 V.S.A. § 545 is amended to read:
§ 545. COVENANTS, CONDITIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS OF
SUBSTANTIAL PUBLIC INTEREST
VT LEG #380258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.306
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) Deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements added after
March 1, 2021 that prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting land development
allowed under 24 V.S.A. § 4412(1)(E) and (2)(A) shall not be valid.
(b) Deed restrictions or covenants added after July 1, 2023 shall not be
valid if they require a minimum dwelling unit size on the property or more
than one parking space per dwelling unit if the property is located in an area
served by municipal sewer and water infrastructure as defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4303 that allows residential uses or more than 1.5 parking spaces for
duplexes and multiunit dwellings in areas not served by sewer and water and in
areas that are located more than one-quarter mile away from public parking
rounded up to the nearest whole number when calculating the total number of
spaces.
(c) Deed restrictions or covenants added after July 1, 2025 on property
zoned for commercial or industrial uses shall not be valid if they prohibit or
have the effect of prohibiting use of the property for commercial or industrial
purposes.
(d) This section shall not affect the enforceability of any property interest
held in whole or in part by a qualified organization or State agency as defined
in 10 V.S.A. § 6301a, including any restrictive easements, such as
conservation easements and historic preservation rights and interests defined in
10 V.S.A. § 822. This section shall not affect the enforceability of any
VT LEG #380258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.306
2025 Page 3 of 3
property interest that is restricted by a housing subsidy covenant as defined by
section 610 of this title and held in whole or in part by an eligible applicant as
defined in 10 V.S.A. § 303(4) or the Vermont Housing Finance Agency.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380258 v.1